New Jersey, session 222, A2473.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A seller of residential real estate shall be prohibited from requiring a potential buyer, when presenting an offer to purchase the residential real estate from the seller, to disclose the amount that the buyer will provide as a down payment for the residential real estate. b.    As used in this section: Down payment means a sum that a buyer pays upfront when purchasing residential real estate and is a percentage of the total purchase price of real estate. Residential real estate means a property or structure or both which serves as a dwelling.  Residential real estate shall not include a dwelling with more than four residential units. 2.    A seller who violates the provisions of this act shall be liable to a civil penalty of no more than $1,000, to be collected in a civil action by a summary proceeding under the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). The Superior Court and the municipal court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999 pursuant to this section. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.